Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
161

POULTRY
INSPECTION

Part I. General Provisions

Section

161-1 Short title

161-2 Findings and declaration of necessity

161-3 Definitions

Part II. Administration, Powers and Duties

161-6 Division of animal industry

161-7 General powers

161-8 Information, investigations, hearings

Part III. Licensing

161-11 Certificate of sanitation

161-12 License required

161-13 Application for a license

161-14 License fees

161-15 Granting, suspending, and revoking
licenses

161-16 Records of licensees

Part IV. Inspection, Labeling, Sanitation,
and

Exemptions

161-21 Ante-mortem inspection

161-22 Post-mortem inspection; reinspection

161-23 Labeling, marking, and branding

161-24 Sanitation

161-25 Slaughter, processing, transportation, and
selling

161-26 Forgery of mark, brand, or label

161-27 Inspectors

161-28 Bribery

161-29 Exemptions

161-30 Storing, handling, and transporting

Part V. Poultry Processors and Related
Industries

161-36 Records; subject to examination

161-37 Articles not intended for human food

161-38 Dead, dying, disabled, or diseased poultry

161-39 Registration

Part VI. Inspection Service, Withdrawal,
and

Compensation

161-41 Inspection; compensation

161-42 Refusal and withdrawal of inspection

Part VII. Violations, Penalties,
Prosecution, Compacts,

Construction

161-46 Interstate and federal compacts

161-47 Penalties; prosecution

161-48 Construction

161-49 Enforcement

161-50 Citation and summons

161-51 Administration of oath

161-52 Failure to obey summons

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next